District of Columbia statutes.
29-105.08

Withdrawal deemed on conversion to domestic filing entity or domestic limited liability partnership.

A registered foreign entity that converts to any type of domestic filing entity or to a domestic limited liability partnership shall be deemed to have withdrawn its registration on the effective date of the conversion.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(a)(35), 59 DCR 13171
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “registered foreign entity that” for “qualified foreign entity registered to do business in the District which”; and “domestic” for “domestic registered”.
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.